Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-546.6 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Health care provider” means any person or other entity who


is licensed pursuant to the provisions of Title 59 or Title 63 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, or pursuant to the laws of another state, to



Req. No. 3037 Page 1


render health care services in the practice of a profession or in


the ordinary course of business;


2. “Pregnancy-based conduct” means the use of alcohol or an


unprescribed controlled dangerous substance by a substance-impacted


perinatal woman that is alleged to affect the woman’s health or the


actual or perceived health, safety, or well-being of the embryo,


fetus, or newborn;


3. “Qualified program” means an addiction recovery or other


behavioral health program certified by the Department of Mental


Health and Substance Abuse Services or a community- or faith-based


program; and


4. “Substance-impacted perinatal woman” means a biological


woman who used a controlled dangerous substance while pregnant or


within twelve (12) months of the conclusion of a pregnancy.


B. If a health care provider identifies a substance-impacted


perinatal woman who has knowingly and repeatedly used alcohol or an


unprescribed controlled dangerous substance, the health care


provider may recommend enrollment in a qualified program.


C. A substance-impacted perinatal woman shall not be subject to


investigation, arrest, or prosecution solely based on her use of any


controlled dangerous substance pursuant to a valid prescription


issued to her by a health care provider and used in accordance with


that prescription.



Req. No. 3037 Page 2


D. If a substance-impacted perinatal woman is already enrolled


in or making a good-faith effort to enroll in and, due to lack of


available treatment capacity or another barrier outside of her


control, is on a waiting list or has completed a qualified program


while pregnant or within twelve (12) months of conclusion of the


pregnancy, she shall not be subject to investigation, arrest, or


prosecution solely based on her use of controlled dangerous


substances during pregnancy including, but not limited to, instances


of miscarriage, stillbirth, or her infant showing signs of Neonatal


Abstinence Syndrome or Fetal Alcohol Spectrum Disorder caused by


such use of alcohol or a prescribed controlled dangerous substance.


E. If a substance-impacted perinatal woman does not make a


good-faith effort to enroll in and attend or complete an addiction


recovery program, or other qualified program, or both, the district


attorney may pursue an appropriate disposition under Section 1-546.5


of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


F. Any health care provider who fails to identify a substance-


impacted perinatal woman’s use of a controlled dangerous substance


or alcohol when the health care provider did not know and could not


reasonably have known of such use, or complies with subsection B of


this section and paragraph 3 of subsection G of this section, shall


be presumed to be acting in good faith and shall have immunity from


any civil liability that might otherwise result by reason of such


act or omission.

Req. No. 3037 Page 3


G. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or


preclude:


1. The investigation, filing, or prosecution of child abuse,


child neglect, or child endangerment charges unrelated to pregnancy-


based conduct;


2. The substance-impacted perinatal woman from losing parental


rights unrelated to pregnancy-based conduct; or


3. A health care provider’s obligation to report a substance-


exposed newborn under Section 1-2-101 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-546.5, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-546.5. A district attorney may convene a


multidisciplinary team to assist in making a determination of the


appropriate disposition of a case of a pregnant woman who is abusing


or is addicted to drugs or alcohol to the extent that the unborn


child is at risk of harm. The multidisciplinary team shall include


at least one person with training and experience in the treatment of


addiction. As used in this section, an appropriate disposition may


include but shall not be limited to filing a petition for


involuntary commitment as provided by Section 5-410 et seq. of Title


43A of the Oklahoma Statutes to a public facility or a private


facility willing to accept the pregnant woman for treatment and at



Req. No. 3037 Page 4


least one person with training and experience in the treatment of


pregnant women.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3037 DC 1/15/2026 9:44:24 AM







































Req. No. 3037 Page 5